Illinois, session 104th, SB1715.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   SB1715- 2 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   SB1715- 3 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   SB1715- 4 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   SB1715- 5 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   SB1715- 6 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   SB1715- 7 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   SB1715- 8 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   SB1715- 9 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   SB1715- 10 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   SB1715- 11 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   SB1715- 12 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   SB1715- 13 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   SB1715- 14 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   SB1715- 15 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   SB1715- 16 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   SB1715- 17 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   SB1715- 18 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code, and, for taxable years ending 24        on or after December 31, 2025, any amount included in 25        gross income under subsection (c) of Section 50 of the 26        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this   SB1715- 19 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 2        250;3            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in 4        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 5        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 6        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 7        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 8        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 9        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 10        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 11        net of bond premium amortization;12            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 13        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 14        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;15            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 16        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 17        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 18        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 19        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 20        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 21        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 22        held under claim of right for the taxable year;23            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 24        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 25        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 26        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would   SB1715- 20 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 2        illness;3            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or 4        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;5            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 6        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 7        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 8        medical care savings account established under the 9        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 10        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 11        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 12        as provided in that Act;13            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 14        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 15        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 16        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 17        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 18        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 19        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);20            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 21        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 22        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 23        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 24        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 25        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;26            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after   SB1715- 21 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 2        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 3        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed 4        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 5        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 6        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 7        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 8        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 9        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 10        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 11        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 12        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 13        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 14        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 15        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 16        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 17        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 18        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 19        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 20        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 21        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 22        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 23        times a number that represents the fractional 24        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 25        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 26        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;  SB1715- 22 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 3        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year 4        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 5        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 6        Section 250;7            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 8        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 9        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 10        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 11        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 12        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 13        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 14        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 16        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 17        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 18        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 19        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 20        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 21        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 22        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 23        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 24        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 25        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 26        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from   SB1715- 23 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 2        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 3        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 4        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 5        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 6        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 7        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 8        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 9        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 10        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 11        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 12        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 13        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;14            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 15        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 16        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 17        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 18        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 19        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 20        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 21        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 22        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 23        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 24        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 25        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 26        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from   SB1715- 24 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 2        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 3        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes 4        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 5        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 6        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 7        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 8        from the provisions of Section 250;9            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 10        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 11        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 12        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 13        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 14        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:15                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 16            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 17            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 18            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 19            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 20            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 21            including the bonus depreciation deduction;22                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 23            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 24            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 25            0.429); and26                (3) for taxable years ending after December   SB1715- 25 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            31, 2005:2                    (i) for property on which a bonus 3                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 4                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 5                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 6                by 0.429);7                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 9                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 10                1.0;11                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 14                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 15                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 16                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 17                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 18                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 19                depreciation on that property; and20                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 22                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 23                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 24                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 25                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 26                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and   SB1715- 26 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 2                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 3                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 4            The aggregate amount deducted under this 5        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 6        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 7        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 8        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 9        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 10        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250;12            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 13        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 14        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 15        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 16        an amount equal to that addition modification. 17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 21        required in any taxable year to make an addition 22        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 23        equal to that addition modification. 24            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 25        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 26        one piece of property.  SB1715- 27 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 2        provisions of Section 250;3            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income, 4        other than salary, received by a driver in a 5        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;6            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 7        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 8        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 9        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 10        modification with respect to such transaction under 11        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 12        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 13        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 14        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 15        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 16        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 17        that is required to make an addition modification with 18        respect to such transaction under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 20        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 21        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 22        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;23            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 24        into account for the taxable year (net of the 25        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 26        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a   SB1715- 28 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 2        for the fact that the foreign person's business 3        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 4        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 5        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 6        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 7        business group but for the fact that the person is 8        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 9        included in the unitary business group because he or 10        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 11        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 12        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 13        made for the same taxable year under Section 14        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 15        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 16        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 17        of Section 250; 18            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 19        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 20        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 21        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 23        for the fact that the foreign person's business 24        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 25        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 26        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to   SB1715- 29 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 2        business group but for the fact that the person is 3        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 4        included in the unitary business group because he or 5        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 6        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 7        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 8        made for the same taxable year under Section 9        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 10        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 11        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 12        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;13            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 14        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 15        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 16        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 17        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 18        provisions of Section 250; 19            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 20        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 21        add back any insurance premiums under Section 22        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 23        that part of a reimbursement received from the 24        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 25        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 26        company) that would have been taken into account as a   SB1715- 30 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 2        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 3        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 4        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 5        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 6        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 7        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250; 9            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 11        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 12        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 13        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 14        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 15        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 16        be considered moneys contributed under this 17        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 18        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 19        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 20        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 21            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 22        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 23        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 24        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 26        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is   SB1715- 31 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 2        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 3        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code; 4            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 5        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 6        operating in this State and licensed under the 7        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 8        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 9        organization operating in this State and licensed 10        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 11        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 12        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 13        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 14        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 15        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 16        of Section 250; and 17            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 18        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 19        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 20        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 21        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 22        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 23        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 24        another state; and 25            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 26        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified   SB1715- 32 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 2        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 3        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal 4        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 5        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 6        during the taxable year from a qualified community 7        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 8        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 9        Act. 10            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 11        provisions of Section 250; and . 12            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 14        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 15        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 16        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 17        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 18        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 19        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 20        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 21        the provisions of Section 250.  22    (b) Corporations.23        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 24    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 25    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).  SB1715- 33 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 2    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 3    of the following amounts:4            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 5        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 6        received from regulated investment companies during 7        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 8        income in the computation of taxable income;9            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 10        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 11        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 12        year;13            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 14        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 15        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 16        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 17        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 19        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 20        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 21        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 22        law and is not a new enactment);23            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 24        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 25        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 26        ending prior to December 31, 1986;  SB1715- 34 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 2        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 3        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 4        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 5        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 6        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 7        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 8        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 9        year, with the following limitations applied in the 10        order that they are listed:11                (i) the addition modification relating to the 12            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 13            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 14            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 15            of addition modification under this subparagraph 16            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 17            which was taken into account in calculating the 18            base income of an earlier taxable year, and19                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 20            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 21            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 22            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 23            such carryback or carryforward;24            For taxable years in which there is a net 25        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 26        than one other taxable year ending prior to December   SB1715- 35 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 2        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 3        computed independently under the preceding provisions 4        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;5            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 6        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 7        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 8        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 9        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;10            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 11        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 12        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 13        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 14        the Internal Revenue Code;15            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 16        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 17        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 18        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 19        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 20        deductions taken in all taxable years under 21        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.22            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 23        the last day of the last tax year for which a 24        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 25        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 26        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction   SB1715- 36 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 2        equal to that subtraction modification. 3            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 4        modification under this subparagraph only once with 5        respect to any one piece of property;6            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 7        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 8        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 10        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 11        member of the same unitary business group but for the 12        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 13        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 14        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 16        who would be a member of the same unitary business 17        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 18        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 19        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 20        required to apportion business income under different 21        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 22        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 23        extent that dividends were included in base income of 24        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 25        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 26        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts   SB1715- 37 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 2        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 3        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 4        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 5        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 6        accrued, or incurred. 7            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 8                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 10            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 11            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 12            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 13            with respect to such interest; or14                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 15            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 16            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 17            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 18            following:19                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 20                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 21                to a person that is not a related member, and22                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 23                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 24                person did not have as a principal purpose the 25                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 26                pursuant to a contract or agreement that   SB1715- 38 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 2                terms; or 3                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 4            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 5            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 6            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 7            and terms and the principal purpose for the 8            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 9            or 10                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 11            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 12            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 13            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 14            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 15            to the application or use of an alternative method 16            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 17                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 18            Director from making any other adjustment 19            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 20            for any tax year beginning after the effective 21            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 22            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 23            Department and such regulations provide methods 24            and standards by which the Department will utilize 25            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 26            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible   SB1715- 39 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 2        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 3        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 4        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 5        foreign person who would be a member of the same 6        unitary business group but for the fact that the 7        foreign person's business activity outside the United 8        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 9        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 10        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 11        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 12        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 13        from being included in the unitary business group 14        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 15        business income under different subsections of Section 16        304. The addition modification required by this 17        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 18        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 19        group for the same taxable year and received by the 20        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 21        business group (including amounts included in gross 22        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 24        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 25        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 26        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or   SB1715- 40 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 2        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 3        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 4        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 5        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 6        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 7        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 8        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 9        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 10        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 11        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 12        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 13        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 14        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 15        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 16        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 17        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 18        similar types of intangible assets.19            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:20                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 21            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 22            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 23            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 24            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 25            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 26            with respect to such item; or  SB1715- 41 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 2            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 3            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 4            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 5            following:6                    (a) the person during the same taxable 7                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 8                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 9                not a related member, and10                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 11                intangible expense or cost between the 12                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 13                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 14                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 15                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 16                or17                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 18            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 20            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 21            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 22            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 23            writing to the application or use of an 24            alternative method of apportionment under Section 25            304(f); 26                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the   SB1715- 42 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            Director from making any other adjustment 2            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 3            for any tax year beginning after the effective 4            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 5            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 6            Department and such regulations provide methods 7            and standards by which the Department will utilize 8            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 9            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 10        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 11        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 12        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 13        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 14        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 15        business group but for the fact that the person is 16        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 17        included in the unitary business group because he or 18        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 19        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 20        addition modification required by this subparagraph 21        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 22        included in base income of the unitary group for the 23        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 25        (including amounts included in gross income under 26        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code   SB1715- 43 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 2        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 3        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 4        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 5        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 6        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 7        the addition modification required under Section 8        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 9        Act; 10            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 11        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 12        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 13        to a real estate investment trust under Section 14        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 15        dividends paid;16            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 17        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 18        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 19        Act;20            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 21        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 22        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 23        for the taxable year; 24            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 25        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 26        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue   SB1715- 44 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        Code for the taxable year; 2            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 3        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 4        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 5        Code for the taxable year; 6            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 7        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 8        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 9        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 10            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 11        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 12        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 13        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 14        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 15        Tax Credit Act; 16    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 17    following amounts:18            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 19        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 20        and included in such total for the taxable year;21            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 22        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;23            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 24        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 25        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 26        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders   SB1715- 45 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        for the taxable year;2            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 3        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 4        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 5        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 6        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 7        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 8        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 9        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 10        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 11        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 12        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 13        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 14        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 15        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 16        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 17        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 19        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 20        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 21        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 22        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 23        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 24        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 25        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 26        year), and, for taxable years ending on or after   SB1715- 46 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        December 31, 2025, any amount included in gross income 2        under subsection (c) of Section 50 of the Internal 3        Revenue Code; the provisions of this subparagraph are 4        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;5            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 6        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 7        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 8        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 9        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 10        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 11        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 12        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 13        net of bond premium amortization;14            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total which were paid by a corporation which 16        conducts business operations in a River Edge 17        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 18        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 19        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 20        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 21        the provisions of Section 250;22            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 23        such total that were paid by a corporation that 24        conducts business operations in a federally designated 25        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 26        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided   SB1715- 47 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 2        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 3        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 4        this subparagraph (L);5            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 6        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 7        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 8        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 9        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 10        property which is eligible for the River Edge 11        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 12        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 13        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 14        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 15        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 16        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 17        investment credit property which secures the loan or 18        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 19        such property on the date that it was placed in service 20        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 21        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 22        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 23        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 24        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 25        calculated under the previous sentence. This 26        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of   SB1715- 48 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        Section 250;2            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 3        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 4        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 5        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 6        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 7        property which is eligible for the High Impact 8        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 9        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 10        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 11        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 12        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 13        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 14        investment credit property which secures the loan or 15        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 16        such property on the date that it was placed in service 17        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 18        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 19        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 20        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 21        eligible for the deduction provided under this 22        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 23        available to taxpayers in any year under this 24        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 25        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 26        attributable to the eligible property as calculated   SB1715- 49 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        under the previous sentence;2            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 3        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 4        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 5        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 6        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 7        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 8        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 9        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 10        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 11        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 12        provisions of Section 250;13            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 14        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 15        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 16        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 17        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 18        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 19        income and received from a corporation that is not 20        created or organized under the laws of the United 21        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 22        including, for taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 24        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 25        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 26        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph   SB1715- 50 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 2        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 3        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 4        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 5        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 6        included in taxable income and received, including, 7        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 8        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 9        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 11        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 12        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 13        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 14        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 15        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 16        affiliated group which includes the dividend 17        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 18        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 19        this subsection (b) which is related to such 20        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 21        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 22        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 23        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 24        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 25        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 26        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This   SB1715- 51 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 2        Section 250 of this Act;3            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 4        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 5        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;6            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 7        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 8        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 9        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 10        the Internal Revenue Code;11            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 12        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 13        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 14        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 15        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 16        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 17        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 18        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 19        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 20        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 21        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 22        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250;24            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 25        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 26        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a   SB1715- 52 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 2        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 3        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 4        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 5        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 6        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 7        provisions of Section 250;8            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 9        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 10        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 11        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 13        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:14                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 15            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 16            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 17            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 18            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 19            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 20            including the bonus depreciation deduction;21                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 22            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 23            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 24            0.429); and25                (3) for taxable years ending after December 26            31, 2005:  SB1715- 53 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                    (i) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 5                by 0.429);6                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 7                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 8                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 9                1.0;10                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 11                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 12                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 13                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 14                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 15                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 16                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 17                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 18                depreciation on that property; and19                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 20                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 21                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 22                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 23                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 24                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 25                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 26                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the   SB1715- 54 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 2                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 3            The aggregate amount deducted under this 4        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 5        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 6        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 7        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 8        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 9        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 10        Section 250;11            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 12        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 13        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 14        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 15        equal to that addition modification.16            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 17        the last day of the last tax year for which a 18        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 19        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 20        required in any taxable year to make an addition 21        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 22        equal to that addition modification. 23            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 24        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 25        one piece of property.26            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the   SB1715- 55 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        provisions of Section 250;2            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 3        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 4        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 5        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 6        modification with respect to such transaction under 7        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 8        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 9        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 10        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 11        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 12        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 13        that is required to make an addition modification with 14        respect to such transaction under Section 15        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 16        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 17        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 18        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 19        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 20        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 21        an addition modification with respect to such 22        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 23        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 24        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 25        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 26        from the provisions of Section 250;   SB1715- 56 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 2        into account for the taxable year (net of the 3        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 4        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 5        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 6        for the fact that the foreign person's business 7        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 8        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 9        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 10        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 11        business group but for the fact that the person is 12        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 13        included in the unitary business group because he or 14        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 15        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 16        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 17        made for the same taxable year under Section 18        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 19        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 20        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 21        Section 250; 22            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 23        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 24        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 25        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 26        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but   SB1715- 57 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        for the fact that the foreign person's business 2        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 3        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 4        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 5        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 6        business group but for the fact that the person is 7        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 8        included in the unitary business group because he or 9        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 10        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 11        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 12        made for the same taxable year under Section 13        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 14        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 15        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 16        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 17            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 18        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 19        add back any insurance premiums under Section 20        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 21        that part of a reimbursement received from the 22        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 23        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 24        company) that would have been taken into account as a 25        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 26        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer   SB1715- 58 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 2        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 3        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 4        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 5        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 6        Section 250; 7            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 8        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 9        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 10        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 11        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 12        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 13        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250; and 15            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 16        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 17        operating in this State and licensed under the 18        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 19        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 20        organization operating in this State and licensed 21        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 22        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 23        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 24        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 25        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 26        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions   SB1715- 59 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        of Section 250. 2        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 3    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 4    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 5    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 6    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 7    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 8    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 9    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 10    (c) Trusts and estates.11        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 12    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 13    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).14        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 15    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 16    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 17    following amounts:18            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 19        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 20        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 21        in the computation of taxable income;22            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 23        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 24        required to distribute all of its income currently, 25        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such   SB1715- 60 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 2        the computation of taxable income;3            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 4        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 5        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 6        year;7            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 8        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 9        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 10        ending prior to December 31, 1986;11            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 12        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 13        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 14        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 15        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 16        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 17        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 18        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 19        the following limitations applied in the order that 20        they are listed:21                (i) the addition modification relating to the 22            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 23            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 24            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 25            of addition modification under this subparagraph 26            (E) which related to that net operating loss and   SB1715- 61 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            which was taken into account in calculating the 2            base income of an earlier taxable year, and3                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 4            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 5            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 6            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 7            such carryback or carryforward;8            For taxable years in which there is a net 9        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 10        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 11        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 12        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 13        computed independently under the preceding provisions 14        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;15            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 16        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 17        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 18        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 19        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 20        of this Act;21            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 22        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 23        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 24        computation of taxable income;25            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 26        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation   SB1715- 62 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 2        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 3        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 4        201;5            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 6        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 7        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 8        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 9        the Internal Revenue Code; and10            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 11        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 12        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 13        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 14        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 15        deductions taken in all taxable years under 16        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 21        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 22        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 23        equal to that subtraction modification. 24            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 25        modification under this subparagraph only once with 26        respect to any one piece of property;  SB1715- 63 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 2        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 3        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 4        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 6        member of the same unitary business group but for the 7        fact that the foreign person's business activity 8        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 9        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 10        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 11        who would be a member of the same unitary business 12        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 13        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 14        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 15        required to apportion business income under different 16        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 17        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 18        extent that dividends were included in base income of 19        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 20        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 21        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 22        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 23        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 24        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 26        the same person to whom the interest was paid,   SB1715- 64 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        accrued, or incurred. 2            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 3                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 4            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 5            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 6            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 7            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 8            with respect to such interest; or9                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 10            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 11            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 12            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 13            following:14                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 15                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 16                to a person that is not a related member, and17                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 18                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 19                person did not have as a principal purpose the 20                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 21                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 22                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 23                terms; or 24                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 25            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 26            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract   SB1715- 65 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 2            and terms and the principal purpose for the 3            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 4            or 5                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 7            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 8            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 9            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 10            to the application or use of an alternative method 11            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 12                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 13            Director from making any other adjustment 14            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 15            for any tax year beginning after the effective 16            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 17            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 18            Department and such regulations provide methods 19            and standards by which the Department will utilize 20            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 21            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 22        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 23        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 24        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 25        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 26        foreign person who would be a member of the same   SB1715- 66 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        unitary business group but for the fact that the 2        foreign person's business activity outside the United 3        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 4        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 6        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 7        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 8        from being included in the unitary business group 9        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 10        business income under different subsections of Section 11        304. The addition modification required by this 12        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 13        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 14        group for the same taxable year and received by the 15        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 16        business group (including amounts included in gross 17        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 19        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 20        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 21        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 22        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 23        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 24        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 25        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 26        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term   SB1715- 67 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 2        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 3        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 4        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 5        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 6        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 7        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 8        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 9        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 10        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 11        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 12        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 13        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.14            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:15                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 18            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 19            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 20            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 21            with respect to such item; or22                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 25            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 26            following:  SB1715- 68 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                    (a) the person during the same taxable 2                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 3                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 4                not a related member, and5                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 6                intangible expense or cost between the 7                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 8                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 9                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 10                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 11                or12                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 13            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 14            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 15            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 16            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 17            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 18            writing to the application or use of an 19            alternative method of apportionment under Section 20            304(f); 21                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 22            Director from making any other adjustment 23            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 24            for any tax year beginning after the effective 25            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 26            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the   SB1715- 69 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            Department and such regulations provide methods 2            and standards by which the Department will utilize 3            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 4            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 6        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 7        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 8        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 15        addition modification required by this subparagraph 16        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 17        included in base income of the unitary group for the 18        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 20        (including amounts included in gross income under 21        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 22        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 23        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 24        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 25        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 26        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the   SB1715- 70 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 2        the addition modification required under Section 3        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 4        Act;5            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 6        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 7        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 8        Act;9            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 10        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 11        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 12        for the taxable year; 13            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 14        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 15        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 16        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 17        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 18        Tax Credit Act; 19    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 20    following amounts:21            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 22        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 23        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 24        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 25        as distributions under the provisions of any 26        retirement or disability plan for employees of any   SB1715- 71 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 2        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 3        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 4        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 5        adopted pursuant thereto;6            (I) The valuation limitation amount;7            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 8        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 9        and included in such total for the taxable year;10            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 11        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 12        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 13        taxation by this State either by reason of its 14        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 15        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 16        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 17        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 18        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 19        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 20        premium amortization;21            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 22        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 23        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 24        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 25        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 26        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the   SB1715- 72 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 2        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 3        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 4        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 5        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 6        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 8        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 9        of the Internal Revenue Code, and, for taxable years 10        ending on or after December 31, 2025, any amount 11        included in gross income under subsection (c) of 12        Section 50 of the Internal Revenue Code; the 13        provisions of this subparagraph are exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250;15            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 16        such total which were paid by a corporation which 17        conducts business operations in a River Edge 18        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 19        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 20        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 21        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 22        the provisions of Section 250;23            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 24        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 25        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;26            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in   SB1715- 73 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        such total that were paid by a corporation that 2        conducts business operations in a federally designated 3        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 4        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 5        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 6        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 7        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 8        this subparagraph (O);9            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 10        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 11        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 12        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 13        the Internal Revenue Code;14            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 15        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 16        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 17        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 18        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 19        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 20        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 21        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 22        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 23        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 24        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 25        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 26        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to,   SB1715- 74 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 2        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 3        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 4        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 5        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 6        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 7        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 8        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 9        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 10        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 11        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 12        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 13        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 14        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 15        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 16        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 17        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 18        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 19        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 22        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 23        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 24        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 25        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 26        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:  SB1715- 75 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 2            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 3            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 4            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 5            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 6            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 7            including the bonus depreciation deduction;8                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 9            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 10            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 11            0.429); and12                (3) for taxable years ending after December 13            31, 2005:14                    (i) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 16                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 17                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 18                by 0.429);19                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 20                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 21                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 22                1.0;23                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 24                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 25                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 26                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the   SB1715- 76 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 2                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 3                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 4                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 5                depreciation on that property; and6                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 7                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 8                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 9                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 10                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 11                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 12                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 13                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 14                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 15                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 16            The aggregate amount deducted under this 17        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 18        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 19        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 20        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 21        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 22        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250;24            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 25        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 26        was required in any taxable year to make an addition   SB1715- 77 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 2        equal to that addition modification.3            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 4        the last day of the last tax year for which a 5        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 6        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 7        required in any taxable year to make an addition 8        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 9        equal to that addition modification. 10            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 11        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 12        one piece of property.13            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250;15            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 16        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 17        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 18        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 19        modification with respect to such transaction under 20        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 21        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 22        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 23        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 24        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 25        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 26        that is required to make an addition modification with   SB1715- 78 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        respect to such transaction under Section 2        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 3        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 4        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250; 6            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 7        into account for the taxable year (net of the 8        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 9        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 10        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 11        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 12        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 13        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 15        who would be a member of the same unitary business 16        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 17        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 18        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 19        required to apportion business income under different 20        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 21        addition modification required to be made for the same 22        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 23        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 25        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 26            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible   SB1715- 79 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 2        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 3        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 5        for the fact that the foreign person's business 6        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 7        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 8        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 15        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 16        made for the same taxable year under Section 17        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 18        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 19        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 21            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 22        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 23        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 25        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 26        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt   SB1715- 80 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        from Section 250; 2            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 3        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 4        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 5        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 6        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;7            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 8        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 9        add back any insurance premiums under Section 10        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 11        that part of a reimbursement received from the 12        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 13        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 14        company) that would have been taken into account as a 15        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 16        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 17        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 18        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 19        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 20        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 21        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 24        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 25        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 26        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal   SB1715- 81 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        Revenue Code; and 2            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 3        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 4        operating in this State and licensed under the 5        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 6        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 7        organization operating in this State and licensed 8        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 9        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 10        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 11        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 12        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 13        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250. 15        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 16    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 17    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 18    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 19    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 20    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 21    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 22    (d) Partnerships.23        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 24    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 25    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).  SB1715- 82 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 2    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 3    of the following amounts:4            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 5        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 6        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 7        in the computation of taxable income;8            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 9        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 10        the taxable year;11            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 12        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 13        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 14        income;15            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 16        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 17        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 18        computation of taxable income;19            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 20        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 21        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 22        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 23        the Internal Revenue Code;24            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 25        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 26        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an   SB1715- 83 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 2        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 3        deductions taken in all taxable years under 4        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.5            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 6        the last day of the last tax year for which a 7        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 8        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 9        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 10        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 11        equal to that subtraction modification. 12            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 13        modification under this subparagraph only once with 14        respect to any one piece of property;15            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 16        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 17        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 18        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 20        member of the same unitary business group but for the 21        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 22        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 23        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 24        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 25        who would be a member of the same unitary business 26        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited   SB1715- 84 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 2        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 3        required to apportion business income under different 4        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 5        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 6        extent that dividends were included in base income of 7        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 8        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 9        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 10        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 11        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 12        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 13        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 14        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 15        accrued, or incurred. 16            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 17                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 18            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 19            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 20            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 21            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 22            with respect to such interest; or23                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 24            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 25            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 26            preponderance of the evidence, both of the   SB1715- 85 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            following:2                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 3                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 4                to a person that is not a related member, and5                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 6                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 7                person did not have as a principal purpose the 8                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 9                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 10                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 11                terms; or 12                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 13            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 14            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 15            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 16            and terms and the principal purpose for the 17            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 18            or 19                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 20            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 21            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 22            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 23            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 24            to the application or use of an alternative method 25            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 26                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the   SB1715- 86 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            Director from making any other adjustment 2            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 3            for any tax year beginning after the effective 4            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 5            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 6            Department and such regulations provide methods 7            and standards by which the Department will utilize 8            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 9            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 10        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 11        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 14        foreign person who would be a member of the same 15        unitary business group but for the fact that the 16        foreign person's business activity outside the United 17        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 18        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 20        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 21        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 22        from being included in the unitary business group 23        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 24        business income under different subsections of Section 25        304. The addition modification required by this 26        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that   SB1715- 87 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 2        group for the same taxable year and received by the 3        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 4        business group (including amounts included in gross 5        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 7        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 8        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 9        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 10        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 11        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 12        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 13        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 14        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 15        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 16        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 17        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 18        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 19        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 20        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 21        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 22        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 23        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 24        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 25        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 26        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and   SB1715- 88 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        similar types of intangible assets;2            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:3                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 4            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 5            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 6            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 7            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 8            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 9            with respect to such item; or10                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 11            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 13            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 14            following:15                    (a) the person during the same taxable 16                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 17                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 18                not a related member, and19                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 20                intangible expense or cost between the 21                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 22                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 23                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 24                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 25                or26                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost   SB1715- 89 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 2            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 3            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 4            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 5            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 6            writing to the application or use of an 7            alternative method of apportionment under Section 8            304(f); 9                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 10            Director from making any other adjustment 11            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 12            for any tax year beginning after the effective 13            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 14            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 15            Department and such regulations provide methods 16            and standards by which the Department will utilize 17            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 18            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 20        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 21        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 22        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 23        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 24        business group but for the fact that the person is 25        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 26        included in the unitary business group because he or   SB1715- 90 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 2        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 3        addition modification required by this subparagraph 4        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 5        included in base income of the unitary group for the 6        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 7        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 8        (including amounts included in gross income under 9        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 10        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 11        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 12        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 13        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 14        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 15        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 16        the addition modification required under Section 17        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;18            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 19        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 20        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 21        Act;22            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 24        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        for the taxable year; 26            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal   SB1715- 91 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 2        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 3        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 4        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 5        Tax Credit Act; 6    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 7    amounts:8            (E) The valuation limitation amount;9            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 10        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 11        and included in such total for the taxable year;12            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 13        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 14        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 15        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 16        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 17        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 18        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 19        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 20        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 21        net of bond premium amortization;22            (H) Any income of the partnership which 23        constitutes personal service income as defined in 24        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 25        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 26        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered   SB1715- 92 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 2        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 5        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 6        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 7        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 8        including amounts distributable to organizations 9        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 10        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 11        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;12            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 13        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 14        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 15        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 16        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 17        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 19        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 20        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 21        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 22        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 23        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 24        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 25        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 26        of the Internal Revenue Code, and, for taxable years   SB1715- 93 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        ending on or after December 31, 2025, any amount 2        included in gross income under subsection (c) of 3        Section 50 of the Internal Revenue Code; the 4        provisions of this subparagraph are exempt from the 5        provisions of Section 250;6            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 7        such total which were paid by a corporation which 8        conducts business operations in a River Edge 9        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 10        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 11        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 12        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 13        the provisions of Section 250;14            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 15        job training project established pursuant to the Real 16        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;17            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 18        such total that were paid by a corporation that 19        conducts business operations in a federally designated 20        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 21        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 22        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 23        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 24        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 25        this subparagraph (M);26            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction   SB1715- 94 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 2        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 3        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 4        the Internal Revenue Code;5            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 6        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 7        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 8        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 9        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 10        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:11                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 12            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 13            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 14            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 15            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 16            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 17            including the bonus depreciation deduction;18                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 19            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 20            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 21            0.429); and22                (3) for taxable years ending after December 23            31, 2005:24                    (i) for property on which a bonus 25                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 26                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by   SB1715- 95 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 2                by 0.429);3                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 4                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 5                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 6                1.0;7                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 9                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 10                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 11                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 12                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 13                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 14                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 15                depreciation on that property; and16                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 17                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 18                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 19                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 20                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 21                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 22                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 23                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 24                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 25                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 26            The aggregate amount deducted under this   SB1715- 96 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 2        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 3        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 4        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 5        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 6        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 7        Section 250;8            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 9        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 10        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 11        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 12        equal to that addition modification.13            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 14        the last day of the last tax year for which a 15        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 16        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 17        required in any taxable year to make an addition 18        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 19        equal to that addition modification. 20            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 21        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 22        one piece of property.23            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 24        provisions of Section 250;25            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 26        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account   SB1715- 97 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 2        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 3        modification with respect to such transaction under 4        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 5        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 6        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 7        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 8        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 9        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 10        that is required to make an addition modification with 11        respect to such transaction under Section 12        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 13        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 14        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 15        from Section 250; 16            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 17        into account for the taxable year (net of the 18        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 19        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 20        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 21        for the fact that the foreign person's business 22        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 23        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 24        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 25        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 26        business group but for the fact that the person is   SB1715- 98 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 2        included in the unitary business group because he or 3        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 4        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 5        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 6        made for the same taxable year under Section 7        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 8        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 9        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 10            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 11        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 12        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 13        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 14        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 15        for the fact that the foreign person's business 16        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 17        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 18        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 19        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 20        business group but for the fact that the person is 21        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 22        included in the unitary business group because he or 23        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 24        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 25        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 26        made for the same taxable year under Section   SB1715- 99 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 2        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 3        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 4        Section 250; 5            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 6        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 7        add back any insurance premiums under Section 8        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 9        that part of a reimbursement received from the 10        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 11        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 12        company) that would have been taken into account as a 13        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 14        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 15        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 16        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 17        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 18        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 19        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 20        Section 250; and 21            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 22        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 23        operating in this State and licensed under the 24        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 25        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 26        organization operating in this State and licensed   SB1715- 100 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 2        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 3        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 4        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 5        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 6        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 7        of Section 250.  8    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.9        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 10    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 11    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 12    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 13    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 14    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 15    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 16    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 17    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 18    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 19    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 20    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 21    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 22    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 23    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 24    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 25    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as   SB1715- 101 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 2    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 3    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 4    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 5    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 6    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 7    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 8    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 9    addition modification must be made under those 10    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 11    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 12    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 13    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 14    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 15    Internal Revenue Code.16        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 17    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 18    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:19            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 20        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 21        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 22        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 23        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 24        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 25        Internal Revenue Code;26            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case   SB1715- 102 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 2        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 3        insurance company taxable income;4            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 5        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 6        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 7        investment company taxable income;8            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 9        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 10        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 11        real estate investment trust taxable income;12            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 13        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 14        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 15        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 16        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 17        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 18        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 19        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 20        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 21        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 22        determined as if the election provided by Section 23        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 24        effect for all such years;25            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 26        corporation or association, the taxable income of such   SB1715- 103 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        organization determined in accordance with the 2        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 4        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 5        activities against income from nonpatronage 6        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 7        association may make an election to follow its federal 8        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 9        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 10        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 11        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 12        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 13        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 14        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 15        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 16        effective for all taxable years with original returns 17        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 18        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 19        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 20        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 21        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 22        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 23        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 24        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 25        requirements for documenting the elections and any 26        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be   SB1715- 104 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 2        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 3        existing law; 4            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 5        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 6        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 7        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 8        of such corporation determined in accordance with 9        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 10        that taxable income shall take into account those 11        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 12        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 13        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 14        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 15        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 16        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 17        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 18        such corporation determined in accordance with the 19        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 20        1982; and21            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 22        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 23        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 24        income shall take into account those items which are 25        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 26        but which would be taken into account by an individual   SB1715- 105 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        in calculating his taxable income.2        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 3    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 4    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 5    business has been classified as business income and in a 6    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 7    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 8    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 9    related to that asset or business that generated the 10    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 11    business income in the year of the disposition of the 12    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 13    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 14    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 15    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 16    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 17    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 18    preceding taxable years.  19    (f) Valuation limitation amount.20        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 21    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 22    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:23            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 24        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 25        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the   SB1715- 106 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 2        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 3        plus4            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 5        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 6        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 7        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 8        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 9        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 10        of such gain included in the amount determined under 11        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).12        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.13            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 14        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 15        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 16        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 17        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 18        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 19        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 20        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 21        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 22        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 23        such property.24            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 25        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 26        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation   SB1715- 107 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1        amount for such property is that amount which bears 2        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 3        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 4        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 5        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 6        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 7        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 8        period for the property.9            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 10        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 11        purposes of this paragraph. 12    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 13otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 14to be deducted more than once. 15    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 16this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 17the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 18account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 19taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 20year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 21computation of base income and net income under this Act for 22such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 23August 1, 1969 or otherwise.24(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21;   SB1715- 108 -LRB104 08345 HLH 18396 b1102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 212-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 3Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 4Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 5eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.